gagauz.lexc
!! Gagauz Lexc !!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Pl +Sg +V +P1sg +P2sg +P3sp +P1pl +P2pl +Nom +Gen +Dat +Acc +Loc +Abl +Ins +P1 +P2 +P3 +Num +Subst +Ord +Dist +İfi +Cond +Nfh +Px1sg +Px2sg +Px3sp +Px2pl +Px3pl +İmp +Neg +Gpraor +Pres +Aor +Prog +Fut +Ger +Gerpast +Gerabst +Gernfh +Gpr_fut +Gpr_past +Gpr_rsub +Gpr_nfh +Gpr_aor +Gna_per +Gna_impf +Gna_ferq +Gna_when1 +Gna_when2 +Gna_time1 +Gna_time2 +Gna_cond +Gna_2 +Iv +Abil +Coop +Pass +Cau

LEXICON Root
Noun ;
Verb ;
Numeral ;

!!! LEXICON !!!

LEXICON Noun

araba N1; ! Deletion of i
ev N1; 
yakın N1; ! L becomes n after nasal consonant
azınnık:azın^lık N1; 
adam N1;
gagavuz N1;
sancak N1;



LEXICON Numeral
bir NUM;
iki NUM;
onbir NUM ; 
oniki NUM ; 
yirmi:yirmi NUM ; 
kırk:kırk NUM ;
elli:elli NUM ;
altmış:altmış NUM ; 
seksen:seksen NUM ;  
bin:bin NUM ;
milion:milion NUM ;
ikişär:ikişär NUM-DIST ;
üçär:üçär NUM-DIST ;
I:I NUM-ROMAN ; 
II:II NUM-ROMAN ; 
III:III NUM-ROMAN ; 
IV:IV NUM-ROMAN ; 
IX:IX NUM-ROMAN ; 
V:V NUM-ROMAN ; 
VI:VI NUM-ROMAN ; 
VII:VII NUM-ROMAN ; 
VIII:VIII NUM-ROMAN ; 
X:X NUM-ROMAN ; 
XI:XI NUM-ROMAN ; 
XII:XII NUM-ROMAN ; 
XIII:XIII NUM-ROMAN ; 
XIV:XIV NUM-ROMAN ; 
XIX:XIX NUM-ROMAN ; 
XV:XV NUM-ROMAN ; 
XVI:XVI NUM-ROMAN ; 
XVII:XVII NUM-ROMAN ; 
XVIII:XVIII NUM-ROMAN ; 
XX:XX NUM-ROMAN ; 
XXI:XXI NUM-ROMAN ; 
XXII:XXII NUM-ROMAN ; 

LEXICON Verb
al V-GNA;
sırala V-DER-NOM;

!!! NOUN !!!
 
LEXICON Possesives
+P1sg:^im #;
+P2sg:^in #;
+P3sp:^sin #;
+P1pl:^imiz #;
+P2pl:^iniz #;

LEXICON Cases
+Nom: #;
+Gen:^nın #;
+Loc:^da #;
+Abl:^nan #;
+Abl:^dan #;
+Acc:^nı #;
+Dat:^na #;

LEXICON Plural
+Pl:^lar #; 

LEXICON NUM 
+Num: # ;
+Num+Subst: SUBST ; 
+Num+Ord:^inci # ;
+Num+Ord+Subst:^inci SUBST  ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN
+Num: # ;

LEXICON N1
+N:0 #;
+N: Plural;
+N: Possesives;
+N: Cases; 

LEXICON NUM-DIST

+Num+Dist: # ;


!!!! VERB !!!!

LEXICON V-PERS-S1
+P1+Sg:^ım # ; 
+P2+Sg:^ın # ; 
+P3+Sg:0 # ; 
+P1+Pl:^iz # ;
+P2+Pl:^inIz # ; 
+P3+Pl:^LAr # ; 

+İfi:^йDI V-PERS-S2 ;
+Cond:^йsA V-PERS-S2 ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2
+P1+Sg:^im # ; 
+P2+Sg:^in  # ; 
+P3+Sg:0 # ; 
+P1+Pl:^iz # ;
+P2+Pl:^inIz # ; 
+P3+Pl:^LAr # ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-FUT
+P1+Sg:A^m # ; 
+P2+Sg:A^n # ; 
+P3+Sg:e^k # ; 
+P1+Pl:a^z # ;
+P2+Pl:a^nIz # ; 
+P3+Pl:ek^LA%r # ; 

LEXICON V-PERS-AOR
+P1+Sg:^Im # ; 
+P2+Sg:^sIn # ; 
+P3+Sg:0 # ;
+P1+Pl:a^z # ;
+P2+Pl:a^nIz # ; 
+P3+Pl:ek^LA%r # ; 


+İfi:^йDI V-PERS-S2 ;
+Nfh:^йmIş V-PERS-S1 ;

LEXICON V-PERS-POSS
+Px1sg:^im #  ;
+Px2sg:^in # ;
+Px3sp:^sIn #  ;
+Px1pl:^imIz # ;
+Px2pl:^inIz #  ;
                         # ;

LEXICON V-PERS-POSS-FUT
+Px1sg:A^m # ; 
+Px2sg:A^n # ; 
+Px3sg:e^k # ; 
+Px1pl:a^z # ;
+Px2pl:a^nIz # ; 
+Px3pl:ek^LAr # ; 



LEXICON V-IMPER
! The imperative, "çok yaşa!", "sigara içmeyin!"
+İmp+P1+Sg:^йAyIm # ;
+İmp+P2+Sg: # ;
+İmp+P3+Sg:^sIn # ;
+İmp+P1+Pl:^йAlIm # ;
+İmp+P2+Pl:^йIn # ;
+İmp+P2+Pl:^йInIz # ; ! Dir/LR
+İmp+P3+Pl:^sIn^LAr # ;

LEXICON GER-N-INFL-COMMON
CASES ;
POSSESSIVES ;

LEXICON GER-SUBST
GER-N-INFL-COMMON ; 
+Pl:^LAr GER-N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-GER
+Ger:^mAk GER-SUBST  ;
+Gerpast:^DIk GER-SUBST ;
+Gerabst:^йIş GER-SUBST ;
+Gernfh:^mIş GER-SUBST  ;

LEXICON V-GPR-SUBST
+Subst: SUBST ;
+Subst+Pl:^LAr SUBST ;

LEXICON V-GPR

+Gpr_fut:^йAc      V-PERS-POSS-FUT ; 
+Gpr_past:^DIk V-PERS-POSS ;

+Gpr_rsub:^йAn     V-GPR-SUBST ;
+Gpr_nfh:^mIş V-GPR-SUBST ;
+Neg+Gpr_past:^mA^DIk POSSESSIVES ;
+Gpr_aor:^Ar #  ;

LEXICON V-GNA

+Gna_per:^йIp # ;
+Gna_impf:^йArAk # ;
+Gna_ferq:^A # ;

+Gna_when1:^йIncAk # ;
+Gna_when2:^DIynAn # ;

+Gna_time1:^DIkçA # ;
+Gna_time2:^DIktAn # ;

+Neg+Gna:^mAdAAn # ;

+Gna_cond:^sA V-PERS-S2 ; 
+Gna_while:^kAn # ;
+Gna_2:^ArsA # ;


LEXICON V-NONFINITE

V-GNA ;
V-GPR ;
V-GER ;

LEXICON V-FINITE-IRREG-NEG

+Neg+Gpraor:^mAz # ; ! THIS IS NOT FINITE

LEXICON V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEG

+İfi:^dı V-PERS-S2 ;
+Nfh:^mIş V-PERS-S1 ;
+Cond:^sa V-PERS-S2 ;

                         V-IMPER ;

LEXICON V-COMMON 
                         V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEG ;
                         V-NONFINITE ;
                         V-FINITE-IRREG-NEG ;

+Pres:^er        V-PERS-AOR ;

+Neg+Pres:^mA^er V-PERS-AOR ; 

+Aor:^ar         V-PERS-AOR ;
+Aor:^ar         V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEG ;

+Prog:^ayor      V-PERS-S2 ; 

+Fut:^йac    V-PERS-FUT ;
+Neg+Fut:^mA^йac    V-PERS-FUT ;

+Nfh:^mIş        V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEG ;

+Neg:^mA         V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEG ;
+Neg:^mA         V-NONFINITE ;
                 V-IMPER ;



LEXICON V-ABIL

+Abil+Neg:^йama V-COMMON ;
+Abil:^йabil    V-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-DER
+Coop:^ış  V-ABIL ;
+Pass:+iл  V-ABIL ;       
+Caus:^dır V-ABIL ;    

LEXICON V-IV 
+V+Iv:· V-DER ;   

LEXICON V-TV 
+V+TV:"·" V-DER ;
